Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.225

Commute trip reduction—Parking revenue—State vehicle parking account.

There is hereby established an account in the state treasury to be known as the "state vehicle parking account." All parking rental income resulting from parking fees established by the department of enterprise services under RCW 46.08.172 at state-owned or leased property shall be deposited in the "state vehicle parking account." Revenue deposited in the "state vehicle parking account" shall be first applied to pledged purposes. Unpledged parking revenues deposited in the "state vehicle parking account" may be used to:

(1) Pay costs incurred in the operation, maintenance, regulation, and enforcement of vehicle parking and parking facilities;

(2) Support the lease costs and/or capital investment costs of vehicle parking and parking facilities; and

(3) Support agency commute trip reduction programs under RCW 70A.15.4000 through 70A.15.4100.

[ 2021 c 65 s 30; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 253; 1995 c 215 s 2; 1993 c 394 s 5.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Finding—Purpose—1993 c 394: See note following RCW 43.01.220.